Utah statutes.
70A-9a-311.   Perfection of security interests in property subject to certain statutes, regulations, and treaties.

(1)  Except as otherwise provided in Subsection (4), the filing of a financing statement is not necessary or effective to perfect a security interest in property subject to:

(a)  a statute, regulation, or treaty of the United States whose requirements for a security interest's obtaining priority over the rights of a lien creditor with respect to the property preempt Subsection 70A-9a-310(1);

(b)  Section 41-1a-601; or

(c)  a statute of another jurisdiction which provides for a security interest to be indicated on a certificate of title as a condition or result of the security interest's obtaining priority over the rights of a lien creditor with respect to the property.

(2)  Compliance with the requirements of a statute, regulation, or treaty described in Subsection (1) for obtaining priority over the rights of a lien creditor is equivalent to the filing of a financing statement under this chapter.  Except as otherwise provided in Subsection (4), Section 70A-9a-313, and Subsections 70A-9a-316(4) and (5) for goods covered by a certificate of title, a security interest in property subject to a statute, regulation, or treaty described in Subsection (1) may be perfected only by compliance with those requirements, and a security interest so perfected remains perfected notwithstanding a change in the use or transfer of possession of the collateral.

(3)  Except as otherwise provided in Subsection (4) and Subsections 70A-9a-316(4) and (5), duration and renewal of perfection of a security interest perfected by compliance with the requirements prescribed by a statute, regulation, or treaty described in Subsection (1) are governed by the statute, regulation, or treaty.  In other respects, the security interest is subject to this chapter.

(4)  During any period in which collateral subject to a statute specified in Subsection (1)(b) is inventory held for sale or lease by a person or leased by that person as lessor and that person is in the business of selling goods of that kind, this section does not apply to a security interest in that collateral created by that person.



Amended by Chapter 225, 2013 General Session

